North Carolina statutes. Chapter 47. Probate and Registration.
Article 4. Curative Statutes; Acknowledgments; Probates; Registration.
§ 47-85.1.
Further as to acknowledgments, etc., before masters in chancery.

All probates, acknowledgments and privy examinations of deeds, mortgages and conveyances of land, which prior to January 1, 1948 have been taken before masters in equity or masters in chancery in any other state, are hereby declared to be valid, and all registrations of such deeds, mortgages or conveyances upon such probates, acknowledgments and private examinations, or any of them are hereby declared to be sufficient and valid. All such deeds and conveyances and registration thereof, and all certified copies of such registrations shall be received in evidence or otherwise used in the same manner and with the same force and effect as other deeds, mortgages and conveyances with probates, acknowledgments, or private examinations made in accordance with the provisions of statutes and laws of this State in force at the time, and as registrations thereof and certified copies of such registrations.

History.

1953, c. 1136.

§ 47-86.
Validation of probate of deeds by clerks of courts of record of other states, where official seal is omitted.

In all cases where, prior to the first day of January, 1891, the acknowledgment, privy examination of a married woman, or other proof of the execution of any deed, mortgage, or other instrument authorized to be registered has been taken before a clerk of a court of record in another state, and such clerk has failed or neglected to affix his official seal to his certificate of such acknowledgment, privy examination, or other proof of execution, of such deed, mortgage or other instrument, or where such court had no official seal and no official seal was affixed to such certificate by reason of that fact, and such deed, mortgage, or other instrument has been ordered to registration by the clerk of the superior court of any county in this State and has been registered, the probate of any and every such deed, mortgage, or other instrument authorized to be registered shall be and hereby is to all intents and purposes validated.

History.

1921, c. 15, ss. 1, 2; C.S., s. 3366(a).

§ 47-87.
Validation of probates by different officers of deeds by wife and husband.

In all cases where, prior to the second day of March, 1895, the acknowledgment, privy examination of a married woman, or other proof of the execution of any deed, mortgage, or other instrument, authorized to be registered, executed by husband and wife, has been taken as to the husband and wife in different states and by different officers having power to take acknowledgments, any and every such acknowledgment, privy examination of a married woman, or other proof of execution, and the probate of any and every such deed, mortgage or other instrument shall be and hereby is, to all intents and purposes validated.

History.

1921, c. 19, ss. 1, 4; C.S., s. 3366(b).

§ 47-88.
Registration without formal order validated.

In all cases where the acknowledgment, privy examination of a married woman, or other proof of the execution of any deed, mortgage or other instrument, authorized to be registered, has been taken before a commissioner in another state appointed by the probate judge of any county of this State, under the provisions of section 20 of Chapter 35 of Battle’s Revisal, during the time said Chapter remained in force and effect, and such commissioner has certified to such acknowledgment, privy examination or other proof, and has returned such deed, mortgage or other instrument to said probate judge, with his certificate endorsed thereon, and such deed, mortgage or other instrument, together with such certificate, has been registered, without any adjudication or order of registration by such probate judge, the probate and registration of any and every such deed shall be, and hereby are, to all intents and purposes validated.

History.

1921, c. 19, ss. 2, 4; C.S., s. 3366(c).

§ 47-89.
Same subject.

In all cases where any deed, mortgage or other instrument has heretofore been acknowledged or probated in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 47-87

and 47-88, and such deed, mortgage or other instrument has been registered, without any order of registration by the probate judge or clerk of the superior court appearing thereon, the probate and registration of any and every such deed, mortgage or other instrument shall be, and hereby is, to all intents and purposes validated.

History.

1921, c. 19, ss. 3, 4; C.S., s. 3366(d).

§ 47-90.
Validation of acknowledgments taken by notaries public holding other office.

In every case where deeds or other instruments have been acknowledged before a notary public, when the notary public, at the time was also holding some other office, and the deed or other instrument has been duly probated and recorded, such acknowledgment taken by such notary public is hereby declared to be sufficient and valid.

History.

1921, c. 21; C.S., s. 3366(e).

§ 47-91.
Validation of certain probates of deeds before consular agents of the United States.

In all cases where the acknowledgment, privy examination of a married woman, or other proof of the execution of any deed, mortgage or other instrument authorized or required to be registered has been taken before any consular agent of the United States, during the time Chapter 35 of Battle’s Revisal remained in force and effect, and such acknowledgment, privy examination, or other proof of the execution of such deed, mortgage, or other instrument is in other respects regular and in proper form, and such deed, mortgage, or other instrument has been duly ordered to registration and registered in the proper county, the acknowledgment, probate, and registration of any and every such deed, mortgage, or other instrument is hereby validated as fully and to the same effect as though such acknowledgment, privy examination, or other proof of execution had been taken before one of the officers named in subsection five of section two of said Chapter 35 of Battle’s Revisal.

History.

1921, c. 157; C.S., s. 3366(f).

§ 47-92.
Probates before stockholders and directors of banks.

No acknowledgment or proof of execution, including privy examination of married women, of any mortgage, or deed of trust executed to secure the payment of any indebtedness to any banking corporation shall be held invalid by reason of the fact that the officer taking such acknowledgment, proof, or privy examination was a stockholder or director in such banking corporation.

History.

1923, c. 17; C.S., s. 3366(g); 2013-204, s. 1.28.

Cross References.

As to probates before officer of interested corporation, see

G.S. 47-63

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-204, s. 1.28, effective June 26, 2013, deleted “taken prior to the first day of January, 1923” following “banking corporation.”

§ 47-93.
Acknowledgments taken by stockholder, officer, or director of bank.

No acknowledgment or proof of execution, including privy examination of married women, of any mortgage or deed of trust executed to secure the payment of any indebtedness to any banking corporation shall be held invalid by reason of the fact that the officer taking such acknowledgment, proof, or privy examination was a stockholder, officer, or director in such banking corporation.

History.

Ex. Sess. 1924, c. 68; 2013-204, s. 1.29.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-204, s. 1.29, effective June 26, 2013, deleted “taken prior to the first day of January, 1924” following “banking corporation.”

§ 47-94.
Acknowledgment and registration by officer or stockholder in building and loan or savings and loan association.

All acknowledgments and proofs of execution, including privy examination of married women, of any mortgage or deed of trust executed to secure the payment of any indebtedness to any State or federal building and loan or savings and loan association shall not be, nor held to be, invalid by reason of the fact that the clerk of the superior court, justice of the peace, notary public, or other officer taking such acknowledgment, proof of execution or privy examination, was an officer or stockholder in such building and loan association; but such proofs and acknowledgments of all such instruments, and the registration thereof, if in all other respects valid, are hereby declared to be valid.

Nor shall the registration of any such mortgage or deed of trust ordered to be registered by the clerk of the superior court, or by any deputy or assistant clerk of the superior court, be or held to be invalid by reason of the fact that the clerk of the superior court, or deputy, or assistant clerk of the superior court, ordering such mortgages or deeds of trust to be registered was an officer or stockholder in any State or federal building and loan or savings and loan association, whose indebtedness is secured in and by such mortgage or deed of trust.

History.

Ex. Sess. 1924, c. 108; 1929, c. 146, s. 1; 1959, c. 489; 2013-204, s. 1.30.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-204, s. 1.30, effective June 26, 2013, deleted “prior to the first day of January, 1955” following “savings and loan association” in the first paragraph.

§ 47-95.
Acknowledgments taken by notaries interested as trustee or holding other office.

In every case where deeds and other instruments have been acknowledged and privy examination of wives had before notaries public, or justices of the peace, prior to October 1, 1991, when the notary public or justice of the peace at the time was interested as trustee in said instrument or at the time was also holding some other office, and the deed or other instrument has been duly probated and recorded, such acknowledgment and privy examination taken by such notary public or justice of the peace is hereby declared to be sufficient and valid.

History.

1923, c. 61; C.S., s. 3366(h); 1931, cc. 166, 438; 1939, c. 321; 1955, c. 696; 1957, c. 1270; 1959, c. 81; 1969, c. 639, s. 1; 1975, c. 320, s. 1; 2013-204, s. 1.31.

§ 47-96.
Validation of instruments registered without probate.

In every case where it shall appear from the records in the office of the register of deeds of any county in the State that any instrument of writing required or allowed by law to be registered prior to January 1, 1869, without any acknowledgment, proof, privy examination, or probate, or upon a defective acknowledgment, proof, privy examination, or probate, the record of such instrument may, notwithstanding, be read in evidence in any of the courts of this State, if otherwise competent.

History.

1923, c. 215, s. 1; C.S., s. 3366(i).

Local Modification.

Cherokee, Graham: 1935, c. 92.

Legal Periodicals.

For suggestion that this section probably means that the registration must have been made prior to 1869, and that this section and

G.S. 47-98

should be considered as amendments or additional sections to Chapter 8, Article 2, see 1 N.C.L. Rev. 302 (1923).

§ 47-97.
Validation of corporate deed with mistake as to officer’s name.

In all cases where the deed of a corporation executed before April 1, 2021, is properly executed, properly recorded and there is error in the probate of the corporation’s deed as to the name or names of the officers in the probate, the deed has the same force and effect as if the probate were in every way proper.

History.

1933, c. 412, s. 1; 2013-204, s. 1.32; 2021-91, s. 4(i).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-204, s. 1.32, effective June 26, 2013, substituted “April 1, 2013” for “the first day of January, 1918”.

Session Laws 2021-91, s. 4(i), effective October 1, 2021, rewrote the section.

§ 47-97.1.
Validation of corporate deeds containing error in acknowledgment or probate.

In all cases where the deed of a corporation executed and filed for registration prior to April 1, 2021, is properly executed and properly recorded, and there is error in the acknowledgment or probate of the corporation’s deed as to the name or names of the officer or officers named and error as to the title or titles of the officer or officers named, the deed has the same force and effect as if the probate or acknowledgment were in every way proper.

History.

1951, c. 825; 2013-204, s. 1.33; 2021-91, s. 4(j).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-204, s. 1.33, effective June 26, 2013, substituted “April 1, 2013” for “the fifteenth day of June, 1947”.

Session Laws 2021-91, s. 4(j), effective October 1, 2021, rewrote the section.

§ 47-98.
Registration on defective probates beyond State.

In every case where it shall appear from the records in the office of the register of deeds of any county in this State that any instrument required or allowed by law to be registered, bearing date prior to the year 1835, executed by any person or persons residing in any of the United States, other than this State, or in any of the territories of the United States, or in the District of Columbia, has been proven or acknowledged, or the privy examination of any feme covert taken thereto, before any officer or person authorized by any of the laws of this State in force prior to the said year 1835 to take such proofs, privy examinations and acknowledgments, and the said instrument has been registered in the proper county without the certificate of the Governor of the state or territory in which such proofs, acknowledgments or privy examinations were taken, or of the Secretary of State of the United States, when such certificate or certificates were required, as to the official character of the person taking such acknowledgment, proof or privy examination, as aforesaid, and without an order of registration made by a court or judge in this State having jurisdiction to make such order, then and in all such cases such proofs, privy examinations, acknowledgments and registrations are hereby in all respects fully validated and confirmed and declared to be sufficient in law, and such instruments so registered may be read in evidence in any of the courts of this State.

History.

1923, c. 215, ss. 2, 3; C.S., s. 3366(j).

Legal Periodicals.

For suggestion that this section and

G.S. 47-96

should be considered as amendments or additional sections to Chapter 8, Article 2, see 1 N.C.L. Rev. 302 (1923).

§ 47-99.
Certificates of clerks without seal.

All certificates of acknowledgment and all verifications of pleadings, affidavits, and other instruments executed by clerks of the superior court of the State prior to March 1, 1945, and which do not bear the official seal of such clerks, are hereby validated in all cases in which the instruments bearing such acknowledgment or certification are filed or recorded in any county in the State other than the county in which the clerk executing such certificates of acknowledgment or verifications resides, and such acknowledgments and verifications are hereby made and declared to be binding, valid and effective to the same extent and in the same manner as if said official seal had been affixed.

History.

1925, c. 248; 1945, c. 798.

§ 47-100.
Acknowledgments taken by officer who was grantor.

In all cases where a deed or deeds dated prior to the first day of January, 1980, purporting to convey lands, have been registered in the office of the register of deeds of the county where the lands conveyed in said deed or deeds are located, prior to said first day of January, 1980, and the acknowledgments or proof of execution of such deed or deeds has been taken as to some of the grantors by an officer who was himself one of the grantors named in such deed or deeds, such defective execution, acknowledgment and proof of execution and probate of such deed or deeds thereon and the registration thereof as above described, shall be, and the same are hereby declared to be in all respects valid, and such deed or deeds shall be declared to be in all respects duly executed, probated and recorded to the same effect as if such officer taking such proof or acknowledgment of execution had not been named as a grantor therein, or in anywise interested therein.

History.

1929, c. 48, s. 1; 1953, c. 986; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1030, s. 51.8.

§ 47-101.
Seal of acknowledging officer omitted; deeds made presumptive evidence.

In all cases where deeds appear to have been executed for land prior to January 1, 1900, and appear to have been recorded in the offices of the registers of deeds in the proper counties in this State, and the same appear to have been acknowledged before commissioners of affidavits (or deeds) of North Carolina, residing in the District of Columbia or elsewhere in the different states, or appear to have been recorded without any certificate being recorded on the record of such deed or deeds, such record or records shall be presumptive evidence of the execution of such deed or deeds by the grantor or the grantors to the grantee or grantees therein named for the lands therein described, and the record of such deed or deeds may be offered or read in evidence upon the trial or hearing of any cause in any of the courts of this State as if the same had been properly probated and recorded: Provided, however, that nothing herein contained shall prevent such record or records from being attacked for fraud, and provided further that this section shall not apply to creditors or purchasers, but as to them the same shall stand as if this section had not been passed, and shall only apply to deeds executed prior to January 1, 1900.

History.

1929, c. 14, s. 1.

§ 47-102.
Absence of notarial seal.

Any deed executed prior to October 1, 2005, and duly acknowledged before a North Carolina notary public, and the probate recites “witness my hand and notarial seal,” or words of similar import, and no seal was affixed to the said deed, shall be ordered registered by the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the land lies, upon presentation to him: Provided, the probate is otherwise in due form.

History.

1935, c. 130; 1943, c. 472; 1945, c. 808, s. 3; 2013-204, s. 1.34.

Cross References.

As to absence of notarial seal from acknowledgment, see

G.S. 47-53.1

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-204, s. 1.34, effective June 26, 2013, substituted “October 1, 2005” for “the first day of January, 1945”.

§ 47-103.
Deeds probated and registered with notary’s seal not affixed, validated.

Any deed conveying or affecting real estate executed prior to January 1, 1932, and ordered registered and recorded in the county in which the land lies prior to said date, from which deed and the acknowledgment and privy examination thereof the seal of the notary public taking the acknowledgment or privy examination of the grantor or grantors thereof was omitted, is hereby declared to be sufficient and valid, and the probate and registration thereof are hereby in all respects validated and confirmed to the same effect as if the seal of said notary was affixed to the acknowledgment or privy examination thereof.

History.

1941, c. 20.

§ 47-104.
Acknowledgments of notary holding another office.

In every case where deeds or other instruments have been acknowledged before a notary public, when the notary public at the time was also holding some other office, and the deed or other instrument has been duly probated and recorded, such acknowledgment taken by such notary public is hereby declared to be sufficient and valid.

History.

1935, c. 133; 1937, c. 284.

§ 47-105.
Acknowledgment and private examination of married woman taken by officer who was grantor.

In all cases where a deed or deeds of mortgages or other conveyances of land dated prior to the first day of January, 1926, purporting to convey lands have been registered in the office of the register of deeds of the county where the lands conveyed in said deeds are located prior to said first day of January, 1926, and the acknowledgments or proof of execution of such deed or deeds and the private examination of any married woman who is a grantor in such deed or deeds have been taken as to some of the grantors, and the private examination of any married woman grantor in such deed has been taken by an officer who was himself one of the grantors named in such deed or deeds, such defective execution, acknowledgment, proof of execution and the private examination of such married woman, evidenced by the certificate thereof on such deed and the registration thereof as above described and set forth, shall be and the same are hereby declared to be in all respects valid, and such deed or deeds or other conveyances of land are declared to be in all respects duly executed, probated and recorded to the same effect as if such officer taking such proof or acknowledgment of execution or taking the private examination of such married woman and certifying thereto upon such deed or deeds had not been named as grantor therein and had not been interested therein in any way whatsoever.

History.

1937, c. 91.

§ 47-106.
Certain instruments in which clerk of superior court was a party, validated.

In all cases where a deed, or other conveyance of land dated prior to the first day of January, 1918, purporting to convey land, wherein the grantor or one of the grantors therein was at the time clerk of the superior court of the county where the land purporting to be conveyed was located, was acknowledged, proof of execution, privy examination of a married woman, and, or, order of registration had and taken before a deputy clerk of the superior court of said county, and the instrument registered upon the order of said deputy clerk of the superior court in the office of the register of deeds of said county, within two years from the date of said instrument, such instrument and its probate are hereby in all respects validated and confirmed; and such instrument, together with such defective acknowledgment, proof of execution, privy examination of a married woman, order of registration, and the certificate of such deputy clerk of the superior court, and the registration thereof, are hereby declared in all respects to be valid and binding upon the parties of such instrument and their privies, and such instrument so probated and recorded together with its certificates may be read in evidence as a muniment of title, for all intents and purposes, in any of the courts of this State.

History.

1939, c. 261.

§ 47-107.
Validation of probate and registration of certain instruments where name of grantor omitted from record.

Whenever any deed, deed of trust, conveyance or other instrument permitted by law to be registered in this State has been registered for a period of 21 years or more and a clerk of the superior court or a register of deeds has adjudged the certificate of the officer before whom the acknowledgment was taken to be in due form and correct and has ordered the instrument to be recorded, but the name of a grantor which appears in the body of the instrument and as a signer of the instrument has been omitted from the record of the certificate of the officer before whom the acknowledgment was taken, such deed, deed of trust, conveyance or other instrument shall be conclusively presumed to have been duly acknowledged, probated and recorded; provided this presumption shall not affect litigation instituted within 21 years after date of registration.

History.

1941, c. 30; 1971, c. 825.

§ 47-108.
Acknowledgments before notaries under age.

All acts of notaries public for the State of North Carolina who were not yet 21 years of age at the time of the performance of such acts are hereby validated; and in every case where deeds or other instruments have been acknowledged before such notary public who was not yet 21 years of age at the time of taking of said acknowledgment, such acknowledgment taken before such notary public is hereby declared to be sufficient and valid.

History.

1941, c. 233.

§ 47-108.1.
Certain corporate deeds, etc., declared validly admitted to record.

Deeds, conveyances and other instruments of writing of corporations entitled to registration, which have been heretofore duly executed in the manner required by law, by the proper officers of the corporation, and which have prior to March 8, 1943, been admitted to registration, on the acknowledgment or proof of the proper executing officer, in the manner required by law, shall be, and the same are hereby declared to be, in all respects validly admitted to record, although such officer at the date of such acknowledgment or proof had ceased to be an officer of such corporation, or such corporation at the date of such acknowledgment or proof had ceased to exist.

History.

1943, c. 598.

§ 47-108.2.
Acknowledgments and examinations before notaries holding some other office.

In every case where deeds or other instruments have been acknowledged, and where privy examination of wives had, before a notary public, when the notary public at the time was also holding some other office, and the deed or other instrument has been otherwise duly probated and recorded, such acknowledgment taken by, and such privy examination had before such notary public is hereby declared to be sufficient and valid.

History.

1945, c. 149.

§ 47-108.3.
Validation of acts of certain notaries public prior to November 26, 1921.

In all cases where prior to November 26, 1921, instruments by law, or otherwise, required, permitted or authorized to be registered, certified, probated, recorded or filed with certificates of notaries public showing the acknowledgments or proofs of execution thereof as required by the laws of the State of North Carolina have been registered, certified, probated, recorded or filed, such registration, certifications, probates, recordations and filings are hereby validated and made as good and sufficient as though such instruments had been in all respects properly registered, certified, probated, recorded or filed, notwithstanding there are no records in the office of the Governor of the State of North Carolina or in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county in which such notaries public were to act that such persons acting as such notaries public had ever been appointed or subscribed written oaths or received any certificates or commissions or were qualified as notaries public at the time of the performance of the acts hereby validated.

History.

1947, c. 102.

§ 47-108.4.
Acknowledgments, etc., of instruments of married women made since February 7, 1945.

All acknowledgments, probates and registrations of instruments wherein any married woman was a grantor, including deeds and mortgages on land, made since February 7, 1945, are hereby validated, approved and declared of full force and effect.

History.

1947, c. 991, s. 2.

§ 47-108.5.
Validation of certain deeds executed in other states where seal omitted.

All deeds to lands in North Carolina, executed prior to January 1, 1991, without seal attached to the maker’s name, which deeds were acknowledged in another state, the laws of which do not require a seal for the validity of a conveyance of real property located in that state, and which deeds have been duly recorded in this State, shall be as valid to all intents and purposes as if the same had been executed under seal.

History.

1949, cc. 87, 296; 1959, c. 797; 1983, c. 398, s. 6; 1985, c. 70, s. 6; 1987, c. 277, s. 6; 1989, c. 390, s. 6; 1991, c. 489, s. 6.

Legal Periodicals.

For brief comment on this section, see 27 N.C.L. Rev. 475 (1949).

§ 47-108.6.
Validation of certain conveyances of foreign dissolved corporations.

In all cases when, prior to April 1, 2021, any dissolved foreign corporation has, prior to its dissolution, by deed of conveyance purported to convey real property in this State, and the instrument recites a consideration, is signed by the proper officers in the name of the corporation, sealed with the corporate seal and duly registered in the office of the register of deeds of the county where the land described in the instrument is located, but there is error in the attestation clause and acknowledgment in failing to identify the officers signing the deed and to recite that authority was duly given and that it was the act of the corporation, the deed has the same force and effect as if the attestation clause and acknowledgment were in every way proper.

History.

1949, c. 1212; 2013-204, s. 1.35; 2021-91, s. 4(k).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-204, s. 1.35, effective June 26, 2013, substituted “April 1, 2013” for “the first day of January, 1947”.

Session Laws 2021-91, s. 4(k), effective October 1, 2021, rewrote the section.

Legal Periodicals.

For brief comment on this section, see 27 N.C.L. Rev. 440 (1949).

§ 47-108.7.
Validation of acknowledgments, etc., by deputy clerks of superior court.

All acts heretofore performed by deputy clerks of the superior court in taking acknowledgments, examining witnesses and probating wills, deeds and other instruments required or permitted by law to be recorded are hereby validated: Provided, nothing in this section shall affect pending litigation.

History.

1949, c. 1072.

§ 47-108.8.
Acts of registers of deeds or deputies in recording plats and maps by certain methods validated.

All acts heretofore performed by a register of deeds, or a deputy register of deeds in recording plats and maps by transcribing a correct copy thereof or permanently attaching the original to the records in a book designated “Book of Plats” is hereby validated the same as if said plats had been recorded as required by

G.S. 47-30

: Provided, however, that nothing herein contained shall affect pending litigation.

History.

1949, c. 1073.

§ 47-108.9.
Validation of probate of instruments pursuant to G.S. 47-12.

The probates of all instruments taken on and after February 7, 1945, in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 47-12

, as amended by section 11 of Chapter 73 of the Session Laws of 1945 and section 1 of Chapter 991 of the Session Laws of 1947 and as further amended by sections 2 and 3 of Chapter 815 of the Session Laws of 1949, are hereby in all respects validated; provided, however, that this section shall not apply to pending litigation.

History.

1949, c. 815, s. 3.

§ 47-108.10.
Validation of registration of plats upon probate in accordance with G.S. 47-30.

The registration of all plats which have prior to February 6, 1953, been admitted to registration upon probate thereof, in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 47-30

as amended by section 1 of Chapter 47 of the Session Laws of 1953, is hereby validated.

History.

1953, c. 47, s. 2.

§ 47-108.11.
Validation of recorded instruments where seals have been omitted.

In all cases of any deed, deed of trust, mortgage, lien, or other instrument authorized or required to be registered in the office of the register of deeds of any county in this State, where it appears of record or it appears that from the instrument, as recorded in the office of the register of deeds of any county in the State, that there has been omitted from the recorded or registered instrument the word “seal” or “notarial seal” and that any of the recorded or registered instruments shows or recites that the grantor or grantors “have hereunto fixed or set their hands and seals” and the signature of the grantor or grantors appears without a seal thereafter or on the recorded or registered instrument or in all cases where it appears there is an attesting clause that recites “signed, sealed and delivered in the presence of,” and the signature of the grantor or grantors appears on the recorded or registered instrument without any seal appearing thereafter or of record, then all such deeds, mortgages, deeds of trust, liens, or other instruments, and their registration in the office of the register of deeds, are in all respects valid and binding and are in all respects valid and binding to the same extent as if the word “seal” or “notarial seal” had not been omitted, and the registration and recording of the instruments in the office of the register of deeds in any county in this State are valid, proper, legal, and binding registrations.

This section does not apply in any respect to any instrument recorded or registered subsequent to April 1, 2021, or to pending litigation or to any instruments now directly or indirectly involved in pending litigation.

History.

1953, c. 996; 1959, c. 1022; 1973, c. 519; c. 1207, s. 2; 1977, c. 165; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1185, s. 1; 1983, c. 398, s. 7; 1985, c. 70, s. 7; 1987, c. 277, s. 7; 1989, c. 390, s. 7; 1991, c. 489, s. 7; 1995, c. 163, s. 16; 1999-456, s. 12; 2013-204, s. 1.36; 2021-91, s. 4(l).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-204, s. 1.36, effective June 26, 2013, substituted “April 1, 2013” for “January 1, 1999” in the second paragraph.

Session Laws 2021-91, s. 4(
l
), effective October 1, 2021, rewrote the section.

§ 47-108.12.
Validation of instruments acknowledged before United States commissioners.

All deeds, mortgages, or other instruments permitted or required by law to be registered, which prior to January 1, 1933, have been proved or acknowledged before a United States commissioner, or U.S. commissioner, are hereby in all respects validated as to such proof or acknowledgment, and all registrations of such deeds or conveyances, upon such probates, acknowledgments and private examinations, or any of them, are hereby declared to be sufficient and validated.

History.

1953, c. 987.

§ 47-108.13.
Validation of certain instruments registered prior to January 1, 1934.

In all cases where prior to January 1, 1934 instruments by law required or authorized to be registered show the signatures and seal of each of the grantors therein and further show that each of such grantors has appeared before or signed such instruments in the presence of a notary public, justice of the peace or other person duly authorized to take acknowledgments, and such instruments have been ordered registered by the clerk of the superior court or other officer qualified to pass upon probate and admit instruments to registration, and actually put on the books in the office of the register of deeds, as if properly acknowledged, all such instruments and their registrations are hereby validated and made as good and sufficient as though such instruments had been in all respects properly acknowledged: Provided, that this section shall not apply to any privy examination or acknowledgment of a married woman.

History.

1953, c. 1334.

§ 47-108.14.
Conveyances by the United States acting by and through the General Services Administration.

The United States of America, acting by and through the General Services Administration may convey lands and other property in the State of North Carolina which is transferable by deed, quitclaim deed, or other means of conveyances without the Regional Director or other duly authorized agent acting for and on behalf of the United States of America, adopting or placing a “seal,” in any form, after the signature of the grantor’s agent, or elsewhere on said deed, quitclaim deed, or other instrument, and the conveyances of the United States of America acting by and through the General Services Administration, and executed by its Regional Director or other duly authorized agent, although without a “seal” appearing thereon, shall be in all respects valid and binding to the same extent as if the word “seal” or some other type of seal, appeared after the signature of the grantor’s agent, or elsewhere on said conveyances.

All conveyances prior to April 19, 1955, where any deed, quitclaim deed, or other instrument conveying land or other property in the State of North Carolina has been executed by the United States of America, by and through the General Services Administration, and said conveyances are authorized or required to be registered in the office of the register of deeds of any county in this State, and it appears from said instrument, or said instrument as recorded in the office of the register of deeds of any county in this State, that a seal has been omitted from said instruments, that notwithstanding the absence of a seal all such conveyances are hereby declared to be in all respects valid and binding to convey lands and property rights in the State of North Carolina to the grantees named therein, to the same extent as if the word “seal,” or a seal in some other form, had appeared after the signature of the grantor’s agent, or elsewhere on said conveyances, and the registration and recording of such conveyances in the office of the register of deeds in all counties in this State are hereby declared to be valid, proper, legal and binding registrations to the same extent as if such conveyances were executed under seal.

History.

1955, c. 629, s. 1.

§ 47-108.15.
Validation of registration of instruments filed before order of registration.

All deeds, deeds of trust, mortgages, chattel mortgages, contracts and all other instruments required or permitted by law to be registered which have heretofore been accepted for filing and registration by registers of deeds on a date preceding the date of the clerk’s order of registration are hereby validated, approved, confirmed and declared to be valid, proper, legal and binding registrations to the same extent as if such instruments had been accepted for filing and registration on the date of or subsequent to the date of the clerk’s order of registration.

History.

1957, c. 1430.

§ 47-108.16.
Validation of certain deeds executed by nonresident banks.

All deeds and other conveyances of land in this State executed on behalf of banks not incorporated in the State of North Carolina, by a trust officer thereof, and properly recorded on or before December 31, 1963, which deeds are otherwise regular and valid, are hereby validated.

History.

1965, c. 610.

§ 47-108.17.
Validation of certain deeds where official capacity not designated.

In all cases where an executor, executrix, administrator, administratrix, guardian or commissioner has executed a deed, deed of trust or other instrument of conveyance permitted by law to be registered in this State and the granting clause of the instrument sets forth the official capacity of the grantor, neither the failure to redesignate the grantor’s official capacity following his or her signature nor the failure to designate the official capacity of the grantor in the acknowledgment of the instrument shall invalidate the conveyance provided the instrument is otherwise properly executed.

History.

1973, c. 1220, s. 1.

§ 47-108.18.
Registration of certain instruments containing a notarial jurat validated.

A notarial jurat constitutes an acknowledgment in due form for all plats or maps that have heretofore been accepted for filing and registration under

G.S. 47-30

as amended. No plat or map heretofore accepted for filing and registration, that contains a notarial jurat instead of an acknowledgment may be held to be improperly registered solely for lack of a proper acknowledgment.

History.

1983, c. 391.

§ 47-108.18A.
Registration of certain instruments containing a notarial acknowledgment.

A notarial acknowledgment constitutes a jurat in due form for all instruments that have heretofore been accepted for filing and registration under this Chapter or which relate to real estate located within this State.

History.

2013-204, s. 1.37.

§ 47-108.18B.
Registration of certain instruments containing a notarial jurat.

A notarial jurat constitutes an acknowledgment in due form for all instruments that have heretofore been accepted for filing and registration under this Chapter or which relate to real estate located within this State.

History.

2013-204, s. 1.37.